Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.340

Audit and allowance of demands against town.

All demands against a town shall be presented to and audited by the council in accordance with such regulations as they may by ordinance prescribe. Upon allowance of a demand the mayor shall draw a warrant therefor upon the treasurer; the warrant shall be countersigned by the clerk and shall specify the purpose for which it is drawn.

The town clerk and his or her deputy shall take all necessary affidavits to claims against the town and certify them.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2064; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.340. Prior: (i) 1890 p 210 s 170, part; RRS s 9188, part. (ii) 1890 p 204 s 156; RRS s 9179.]